Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB542.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1535(d) and (e) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1535. Schedule of convictions and points.* * *(d) [Exception] Exceptions.--(1) This section does not apply to a person who was operating a pedalcycle or an animal drawn vehicle.(2) If a speeding offense under section 3362 (relating to maximum speed limits) is charged as a result of the use of a device authorized under section 3368(c)(2)(ii) (relating to speed timing devices), no points shall be assigned under subsection (a) unless the speed recorded is 10 or more miles 1234567891011121314151617181920 per hour in excess of the legal speed limit.(e) Suspension of operating privilege.--In addition to other provisions of this title relating to the suspension or revocation of operating privileges, the department shall suspend for 15 days the operating privileges of any person who for a violation in an active work zone is convicted under:(1) section 3361 where the department has received an accident report submitted pursuant to section 3751 (relating to reports by police); or(2) section 3362 [(relating to maximum speed limits)] by exceeding the posted speed limit by 11 miles per hour or more.A conviction report received by the department which indicates that the violation of section 3361 or 3362 occurred in an active work zone shall create a presumption that the violation occurred in an active work zone.Section 2. Section 3368(a), (c) and (e) of Title 75 are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3368. Speed timing devices.(a) Speedometers authorized.--The rate of speed of any vehicle may be timed on any highway by a police officer using a motor vehicle equipped with a speedometer[.], except as provided in section 6109 (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities). In ascertaining the speed of a vehicle by the use of a speedometer, the speed shall be timed for a distance of not less than three-tenths of a mile.* * *(c) Mechanical, electrical and electronic devices authorized.--20250SB0542PN0560 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in section 6109, the rate of speed of any vehicle may be timed on any highway by a police officer using a mechanical or electrical speed timing device.(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), electronic devices such as radio-microwave devices, commonly referred to as electronic speed meters or radar, or infrared laser light devices, commonly referred to as LIDAR, may be [used only as part of an automated speed enforcement system or by members of the Pennsylvania State Police.] used:(i) As part of an automated speed enforcement system.(ii) By members of the Pennsylvania State Police.(iii) Upon completion of a training course approved by the Pennsylvania State Police and the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission, by full-time police officers employed by the full-service police department of a political subdivision or regional police department situate in a county of the first class, second class, second class A or third class if official warning signs indicating the use of these devices are erected within 500 feet of the border of the political subdivision on the main arteries entering that political subdivision.(3) Electronic devices which calculate speed by measuring elapsed time between measured road surface points by using two sensors and devices which measure and calculate the average speed of a vehicle between any two points may be used by any police officer.(4) No person may be convicted upon evidence obtained 20250SB0542PN0560 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through the use of devices authorized by paragraphs (2) and (3) unless the speed recorded is six or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit. Furthermore, no person may be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of devices authorized by paragraph (2)(ii) or (3) in an area where the legal speed limit is less than 55 miles per hour if the speed recorded is less than ten miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit. This paragraph shall not apply to evidence obtained through the use of devices authorized by paragraph (2) or (3) within a school zone or an active work zone.(5) Light detection and ranging devices, commonly referred to as LIDAR, may be used only as part of an automated speed enforcement system or by members of the Pennsylvania State Police.(6) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Full-service police department." A local or regional police department that:(i) is authorized by one or more political subdivisions;(ii) provides 24-hour-per-day patrol and investigative services; and(iii) reports activities monthly to the Pennsylvania State Police in accordance with the Uniform Crime Reporting Program." Full-time police officer. " (i) An employee of a political subdivision or regional police department who complies with all of the 20250SB0542PN0560 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(A) Is certified under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(B) Is empowered to enforce 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) and this title.(C) Is a regular full-time police officer under the act of June 15, 1951 (P.L.586, No.144), referred to as the Police Tenure Act, or works a minimum of 200 days per year.(D) Is provided coverage by a police pension plan under:(I) the act of May 24, 1893 (P.L.129, No.82), entitled "An act to empower boroughs and cities to establish a police pension fund, to take property in trust therefor and regulating and providing for the regulation of the same";(II) the act of May 22, 1935 (P.L.233, No.99), referred to as the Second Class City Policemen Relief Law;(III) the act of May 29, 1956 (1955 P.L.1804, No.600), referred to as the Municipal Police Pension Law;(IV) the act of July 15, 1957 (P.L.901, No.399), known as the Optional Third Class City Charter Law; or(V) the provisions of 11 Pa.C.S. Pt. V (relating to third class cities).(ii) The term does not include auxiliary, part-time or fire police.20250SB0542PN0560 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(e) Distance requirements for use of mechanical, electrical and electronic devices.--[Mechanical](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), mechanical, electrical or electronic devices may not be used to time the rate of speed of vehicles within 500 feet after a speed limit sign indicating a decrease of speed. This limitation on the use of speed timing devices shall not apply to speed limit signs indicating school zones, bridge and elevated structure speed limits, hazardous grade speed limits and work zone speed limits.(2) Whenever radio-microwave speed timing devices or infrared laser light devices are used by a local or regional police officer of a political subdivision authorized under subsection (c), the police officer must locate the vehicle with the radio-microwave speed timing device or infrared laser light device in a location that is not intentionally concealed from the motoring public.* * *(g) Local ordinance required to enforce.--(1) Prior to use of radio-microwave speed timing devices or infrared laser light devices used for speed timing by local or regional police officers of political subdivisions authorized under subsection (c), the appropriate governing body must adopt an ordinance authorizing the local or regional police department to employ the devices on roads within the boundaries of the governing body where a required engineering and traffic study has been conducted and in accordance with section 6109(a)(11) (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities) to address 20250SB0542PN0560 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resident complaints or demonstrable traffic safety concerns, such as high crash rates or fatalities.(2) During the initial 90 days of speed enforcement by a local or regional police department of a political subdivision authorized under subsection (c) using radio-microwave speed timing devices or infrared laser light devices, persons may only be sanctioned for violations with a written warning.(h) Excess revenues.--The primary use of radar or LIDAR by local or regional police officers of political subdivisions authorized under subsection (c) is for traffic safety purposes. Each local or regional police department that uses radar or LIDAR shall report annually to the Pennsylvania State Police the municipal revenue generated from speed enforcement citations on forms as may be prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. In the event the municipal share of revenue generated from speed enforcement citations exceeds 5% of the total municipal budget or 5% of the regional police department budget, all sums in excess thereof shall be remitted to the Pennsylvania State Police to be used for traffic safety purposes.Section 3. Section 6109(a)(11) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 6109. Specific powers of department and local authorities.(a) Enumeration of police powers.--The provisions of this title shall not be deemed to prevent the department on State-designated highways and local authorities on streets or highways within their physical boundaries from the reasonable exercise of their police powers. The following are presumed to be reasonable exercises of police power:* * *20250SB0542PN0560 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) Enforcement of speed restrictions authorized under Subchapter F of Chapter 33[, except that] in accordance with the following:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), speed restrictions may be enforced by [local police] full-time police officers employed by the full-service police department of a political subdivision or regional police department on a limited access or divided highway only if [it] this title authorizes enforcement and the highway is patrolled by the local or regional police force under the terms of an agreement with the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) If this title authorizes speed restrictions to be enforced by a police department of a city of the first class, the restrictions may be enforced on limited access or divided highways within the police department's jurisdiction. An agreement with the Pennsylvania State Police is not necessary under this subparagraph.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0542PN0560 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819